Utah statutes.
59-12-104.3.    Credit for certain repossessions of a motor vehicle.
(1) (a)  Subject to Subsections (2) and (3), a seller that collects a tax
under this chapter on the sale of a motor vehicle may claim a credit for a tax
under this chapter for a motor vehicle that:
(i)  has been repossessed; and
(ii)  that the seller resells.
(b)  A seller of a motor vehicle other than the seller that collects a tax
under this chapter on the sale of that motor vehicle may claim a credit for a
tax under this chapter:
(i)  for a motor vehicle that the seller:
(A)  repossessed; and
(B)  resells; and
(ii)  if the seller that collected the tax under this chapter on that motor
vehicle:
(A)  is no longer doing business in this state; and
(B)  does not owe a tax under this chapter.
(2)  The amount of the credit allowed by Subsection (1) is equal to the
product of:
(a)  the portion of the motor vehicle's purchase price that:
(i)  was subject to a tax under this chapter; and
(ii)  remains unpaid after the motor vehicle is resold; and
(b)  the sum of the tax rates imposed:
(i)  under this chapter;
(ii)  on the motor vehicle's purchase price; and
(iii)  on the date the motor vehicle was purchased by the person that owns the
motor vehicle at the time of the repossession.
(3)  Except as provided in Subsection (4), if a seller recovers any portion of
a motor vehicle's unpaid purchase price that is used to calculate a credit
allowed by Subsection (1)(b), the seller shall report and remit a tax under
this chapter to the commission:
(a)  on the portion of the motor vehicle's unpaid purchase price that:
(i)  the seller recovers; and
(ii)  is used to calculate the credit allowed by Subsection (1)(b); and
(b)  on a return filed for the time period for which the portion of the motor
vehicle's unpaid purchase price is recovered.
(4)  A credit under this section may not be reduced by any amount of a motor
vehicle's unpaid purchase price that a seller recovers as a result of
reselling the vehicle, regardless of whether that amount is included in
calculating a credit under this section.
